Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2439YH (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 206 Section 1. Section 321.438, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. A person shall not operate on the highway a motor 3 vehicle equipped with a front windshield, a side window to the 4 immediate right or left of the driver, or a sidewing forward 5 of and to the left or right of the driver which is excessively 6 dark or reflective so that it is difficult for a person outside 7 the motor vehicle to see into the motor vehicle through the 8 windshield, window, or sidewing that meets a minimum standard 9 of transparency of less than fifty percent light transmittance . 10 a. The department shall adopt rules establishing a minimum 11 measurable standard of transparency which shall apply to 12 violations of this subsection . 13 b. This subsection does not apply to a person who operates 14 a motor vehicle owned or leased by a federal, state, or local 15 law enforcement agency if the operation is part of the personâs 16 official duties. 17